src/fastspell_dictionaries/awa.dic
तुलसि/9,14,16,24,58,73
थोर/1,2,4,6,19,26,171,200
दुआरे/249
देन/1,2,6,239
देव/1,2,4,10,17,23,25,27,31,38,42,70,74,82,84,88,104,108,156,157,168,240
देवतन/4,144
धरि/28,44,53,225,238
धान/2,4,100
नमक/187
नवा/10,11,18,33,36,48,146
निदान/1,7,12,13
नेह/1,2,7,12,13,14,135,235
पलक/6,57,68,91
पवन/7,16
पाव/1,3,8,9,11,14,15,17,18,19,22,23,24,26,28,30,32,57,65,67,101
पावइ/149
पिआ/33,36,48,61,102,117,125,142,206,231
पिय/8,9,11,15,19,21,25,29,43,47,67,76,88,104,108,122,133,155,163,213,248
पिसाच/1,2,106
पूँछि/22,24,159
पूज/1,2,3,4,6,8,9,14,15,23,24,26,29,35,49,57,62,86,87,88,95,107,212,241
प्राप्त/4,121
फिरि/64,105,118
बँध/1,4,8,54,74,84,147,210
बंधु/16,130,179
बतकही/5
बता/18,33,36,37,44,48,61,89,94,99,102,117,142,151
बना/18,33,39,44,46,48,61,99,109,142,242
बहा/11,18,33,37,43,47,48,61,92,94,102,151
बहि/3,12,39,43,65,76,140,161
बहिन/68
बहु/3,43,56,72,76,81,139,141
बाँच/1,2,4,6,8,11,19,40,41,47,51,188
बाज/1,2,4,6,7,8,13,14,15,92,108,133,143,166,199
बातन/209
बाद/2,4,7,14,25,49,56,210,241
बाप/2,3,6,7,13,16,20,35,121,153
बारिद/7,112
बिका/11,17,18,22,36,43,47,76,92,117,125,165,231
बितर/30,97,157
बिद/1,25,34,38,41,42,50,51,88,95,133,138,153
बिधि/1,9,14,16,21,24,27,46,48,58,60,135
बिन/1,6,7,9,14,18,32,33,36,48,50,99,110,142,146,213,254
बिराज/1,2,6,8,9,15,32,41,54,57,118,236
बिष/7,18,24,39,71,80,134
बिस/7,41,46,48,77,113,203,223
बिहँसा/47,110
बिहग/41,166,201
बीर/1,7,13,27,174
बुला/11,18,33,44,61,85,89,92
बूड़/1,2,4,6,8,11,14,18,40,62
बेद/1,2,3,4,7,9,21,31,47,58,60,114,121,198
बैठ/1,2,3,4,6,7,8,14,15,19,23,26,29,32,35,38,40,42,45,52,73,74,88,97,133,138,189,210
बोल/1,2,3,4,6,7,8,9,11,14,15,16,21,24,29,30,32,34,35,37,38,40,41,42,45,51,52,63,74,84,87,92,95,97,104,107,122,137,147,156,157,163,164,210,211,212,248
बोला/163,242
बोवइ/39,59,160
ब्रह्म/1,7,77,112,123,197,208,217
भक्त/2,3,4,51,130,192
भगति/77,158,194
भजि/14,44,53,238
भरइ/129
भरि/3,8,12,75,93,136
भले/5,9,14,16,20,24,28,60,234
भवन/7,30
भार/1,2,5,6,7,8,9,13,19,32,110
भूत/1,4,56,77,148,168
भूमि/183,198
भोग/1,2,3,6,7,8,9,11,13,101,132
मंत्र/2,7,9,137
मंदिर/3,31,91
मनफिराव/1,11,61,101,163
मरि/3,8,9,12,28,36,37,44,46,53,75,93,159
मर्/205,206
महि/5,47,115,181,232
मही/5,17,30,47,70,91,92,115,117,128,218
महेस/7,9,12,16
माया/70,77,118,135,148
मिल/1,2,3,4,6,7,8,9,11,12,14,15,18,26,29,30,32,34,35,38,40,42,45,47,52,54,57,61,62,63,64,65,67,71,84,87,95,96,97,107,116,122,146,156,157,163,189,200,211,216,246,248
मीत/3,7,19,21
मुँह/1,3,6,47,125
मुक्त/2,44,139,190
मूर्ख/3,27,182
रंक/1,7,9,12,31,207
रखत/29,66
रघुनंद/13,216
रबि/9,116,208
रमा/70
रहस्य/3,77,126
रहि/3,8,9,12,22,24,28,31,44,53,75,93,127,136,159,173,225,237
रहै/5,119
राख/1,2,3,4,6,7,8,11,14,15,16,20,22,24,26,29,35,41,45,51,52,54,62,67,87,95,96,101,107,163,164,176,211,212
राम/1,5,7,9,12,13,14,15,16,19,21,24,66,83,111,125,143,166,192,197,199,217
रामनाम/7,16,21,83,111,199
रिपु/9,12,16,77
रूप/1,2,3,5,6,7,12,15,19,26,33,39,59,68,123,132,194,217
लगइ/28,237
लगा/11,18,23,36,37,39,69,80,92,94,102,142,151,207
लरि/21,241
लात/1,31,82
लालच/1,2,7,135
लिख/1,2,3,4,6,7,8,11,12,15,22,29,32,34,38,40,41,42,52,54,57,63,65,87,163
लिय/1,6,15,19,20,36,42,74,84,104,248
वहि/12,43,73,105,118,196
वारि/78,113,218
शोक/203
संकट/7,30,230
सके/3,17,20,22,136,180
सतु/33
सत्त/1,25,81
सनक/2,84,133
सपन/1,6,19,26,95
सभा/10,36,167
सरग/6,7,41,58,244
सरब/81,128,184,206
सरा/9,36,60,66,93,150,159,252
सर्ब/1,112,128,139,184,192
सहा/11,18,33,36,37,61,72,76,99
साधन/16,21,158
सामु/28,252
सिख/1,2,4,6,11,25,38,42,48,62,74,84,89,97,104,109,248
सिखा/89,142,161
सिध/38,74,84,88,97,131,133,155
सिरा/3,11,14,18,28,30,32,65,92,254
सुंदर/2,4,5,27,219
सुआ/20,117,184
सुख/2,4,7,9,14,29,38,42,77,88,100,113,122,133,139,162,166,172,196,204,217,224,245,246,253
सुत/1,3,7,9,14,21,165,176,192,244
सुध/1,2,3,4,43,88,123,124,133,138,141
सुन/1,2,4,6,7,8,9,11,14,15,18,19,22,24,26,28,29,34,38,40,41,42,45,49,51,54,57,60,63,74,84,87,97,101,104,107,118,147,156,157,176,189,200,210,222,237,246,247,248
सुनाए/9,22,24,50
सुभाव/9,14,83
सुमन/58,77,204
सुमिर/2,3,4,6,7,8,14,15,24,26,28,47,49,52,67,95,96,107,164
सुरसरि/27,60
सोहा/14,30,32,109,110,118,150
स्वारथ/2,7,9,12,14,16,141,192
हरष/1,2,4,6,7,8,14,18,34,35,38,42,52,71,134,172,188,202,204,245
हाँ/110,128,231
हुआ/10,14
हुइ/12,93,105,136,167
होय/1,6,220
